Utah statutes.
34A-1-106.   Fees.
(1)  Unless otherwise provided by statute, the commission may adopt a schedule
of fees assessed for services provided by the commission by following the
procedures and requirements of Section 63J-1-504.
(2)  The commission shall submit each fee established under this section to
the Legislature for its approval as part of the commission's annual
appropriations request.
